Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 8
MAIL-IN AND EARLY VOTING

1-8-101 to 1-8-311. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article repealed, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 77, § 51, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 14 of chapter 49, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2014, consult the 2013 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions relating to mail ballots and early voting in nonpartisan local government elections not conducted by county clerk and recorders, see article 13.5 of this title.